Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses
186.120.
Refund of portion of fee when motor vehicle destroyed.

If any motor vehicle other than a commercial vehicle upon which the license tax has been paid is destroyed by fire or accident, so that the vehicle is rendered entirely useless the owner shall be entitled to have refunded to him a part of the license fee paid by him proportionate to the registration period for which the license was granted.

If any commercial vehicle upon which the license tax has been paid is destroyed by fire or accident so that the vehicle is rendered entirely useless the owner is entitled to have refunded to him that portion of the tax which he had theretofore paid allocable to the remaining complete quarters of the unexpired period for which the tax was paid.

To obtain the refund, the owner whose motor vehicle has been destroyed shall apply to the Transportation Cabinet, submitting his affidavit and the affidavits of two (2) reputable persons, attesting to the fact that the vehicle has been destroyed, and the manner of destruction, and shall return the original license plates to the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet shall examine all applications and investigate the claims for refund, and if a claim is found to be correct, it shall approve it for payment, whereupon the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall draw a warrant upon the State Treasurer in favor of the owner of the destroyed vehicle, and charge the amount of it to the state road fund.

History.

2739g-2e, 2739g-2f: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 62, § 7; 1966, ch. 139, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(9); 1976, ch. 133, § 7.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Garrison and Martin, Kentucky Commercial Motor Vehicle Transportation Tax Legislation I, 33 Ky. L.J. 3 (1944).

186.130.
Proportionate fees for commercial vehicle operated after registration year began.

If any person offers a commercial vehicle for registration after April 1 of any year by reason of not having operated such vehicle on the public highways after April 1 of that year, the registration fee shall be as many twelfths of the annual fee as there are unexpired months in the registration year.

History.

2739g-4: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 10; 1976, ch. 133, § 8; 1978, ch. 239, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 113, § 2, effective April 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 97, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

186.140.
Reciprocity for nonresidents.

Except as provided in KRS

281.835

and

281.836

, a nonresident owner, from a state not requiring registration of nonresidents temporarily in it, who has complied with the laws of the state of his residence relating to registration of motor vehicles, and who displays the requisite plates and holds the requisite receipt or certificate of registration as required by his resident state, shall be exempt from registration in this state for the same period of time as is granted to nonresident owners by the laws and regulations of his state. Registration in any other state shall not relieve any owner resident in this state from the penalties provided in KRS

186.990

.

History.

2739g-5: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 57, § 3.

186.145.
Registration of nonresident by use of copy of registration or title document.

Any motor vehicle properly registered and titled in another state belonging to a nonresident, which vehicle is required to be registered in this state by reason of lack of reciprocal agreement with the state in which it is registered, or by reason of not qualifying for reciprocity under an existing reciprocal agreement with the state in which it is registered, may be registered with the county clerk by presenting a photostat or certified copy of the registration receipt or certificate of title issued to the nonresident in his home state. The registration receipt issued by the county clerk shall be stamped across its face with a notation prescribed by the cabinet that will indicate the registration receipt so issued cannot be used in transferring legal title to the motor vehicle. However, under regulations prescribed by the cabinet, a registration receipt so issued may be transferred to a new owner if the foreign legal title and registration is transferred in that state to the new owner. Nothing contained in this section shall release the owner of the vehicle from any tax fees or other requirements imposed by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 62, § 3; 1968, ch. 40, Part IV, § 4.

186.150.
Residents not to use license of other states.

No resident operating a motor vehicle on the highways, shall secure or license the motor vehicle in any state other than Kentucky unless so licensed in conformity with a motor vehicle reciprocal arrangement or under the international registration plan.

The use of a license of any state other than Kentucky by a resident of this state on his car driven over Kentucky highways shall be prima facie evidence of guilt.

History.

2739g-5a, 2739g-5b: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 431, § 11, effective July 15, 1986.

186.160.
Motor numbers essential to registration — Assignment of number.

No clerk shall receive an application for registration nor register a motor vehicle, unless the motor vehicle bears a motor number or a vehicle identification number. If there is no motor number or vehicle identification number, or if the number is not plainly legible, the owner shall apply through the clerk to the Transportation Cabinet for a motor number or vehicle identification number, and when that number is assigned to the owner’s motor vehicle the owner shall cause the number to be stamped on the motor with a steel die or in the space provided by manufacturer for vehicle identification number. That number shall thereafter be used by the owner in making registration or executing a bill of sale.

History.

2739g-8: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 153, § 4; 1962, ch. 62, § 8.

186.162.
Special license plates for members or supporters of certain groups and organizations — Initial and renewal fees — Combination of special license plate with personalized license plate — Special license plates for motorcycles.

As used in this section and in KRS

186.043

,

186.164

,

186.166

,

186.1722

, and

186.174

:

“Special license plate” means a unique license plate issued under this chapter to a group or organization that readily identifies the operator of the motor vehicle or motorcycle bearing the plate as a member of a group or organization, or a supporter of the work, goals, or mission of a group or organization. The term shall not include regular license plates issued under KRS

186.240

;

“Street rod” means a modernized private passenger motor vehicle manufactured prior to the year 1949, or designed or manufactured to resemble a vehicle manufactured prior to 1949;

“SF” means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is dedicated for use by the Transportation Cabinet;

“CF” means the county clerk’s fee for issuing a motor vehicle registration as established under KRS 186.040(1). If a CF amount is charged for a license plate listed in this section, the applicant for that plate shall also pay the fees identified in KRS 186.040(6). If a CF amount is not charged, the applicant shall not be required to pay those fees; and

“EF” means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license plate that is mandated by this chapter to be dedicated for use by a particular group or organization.

The initial purchase fee and renewal fee for a special license plate created under this chapter shall be as established in this subsection and includes the name of group or organization and the total initial and renewal fee required for the plate. The amount in parentheses indicates how the total fee is required to be divided:

Disabled veterans who receive assistance to purchase a vehicle from the United States Department of Veterans’ Affairs, veterans declared by the United States Department of Veterans’ Affairs to be one hundred percent (100%) service-connected disabled, and recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor:

Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).

Former prisoners of war and survivors of Pearl Harbor:

Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS

40.460

2. Renewal Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Members of the Kentucky National Guard and recipients of the Purple Heart:

Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS

40.460

2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Members of the Civil Air Patrol; active, retired, veteran, reserve, or auxiliary members of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard; Merchant Marines who served between December 7, 1941, and August 15, 1945; recipients of the Silver Star Medal, the Distinguished Flying Cross, the Air Medal, the Combat Action Badge, the Combat Infantry Badge, or the Bronze Star Medal; persons who wish to receive Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plates beyond the two (2) exempted from fees under KRS 186.041(6); individuals eligible for a special military service academy license plate under KRS 186.041(8); individuals eligible for a special military unit license plate under KRS

186.163

; and disabled veterans who have been declared to be between fifty percent (50%) and ninety-nine percent (99%) service-connected disabled by the United States Department of Veterans’ Affairs:

Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Recipients of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross:

Initial Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Disabled license plates:

Initial Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Historic vehicles:

Initial Fee $56 ($50 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). for two plates: 2. Renewal Fee: Do not renew annually.

Members of Congress:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Firefighters:

Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters Association). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Firefighters Association).

Emergency management:

Initial Fee: $31 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Fraternal Order of Police:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky FOP Death Benefit Fund). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky FOP Death Benefit Fund).

Law Enforcement Memorial:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation, Inc.). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation, Inc.).

Personalized plates:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Street rods:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Nature plates:

Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund established under ). KRS

146.570

2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund established under ). KRS

146.570

Amateur radio:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).

Kentucky General Assembly:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Kentucky Court of Justice:

Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Masons:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic Homes of Kentucky).

Collegiate plates:

Initial Fee: $53 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the university whose name will be borne on the plate). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general scholarship fund of the university whose name will be borne on the plate).

Independent Colleges:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds members). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the general scholarship funds members).

Child Victims:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims’ trust fund established under ). KRS

41.400

2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the child victims’ trust fund established under ). KRS

41.400

Kentucky Horse Council:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council). 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the Kentucky Horse Council).

Ducks Unlimited:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited). 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks Unlimited).

Spay neuter:

Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control and care fund established under ). KRS

258.119

2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the animal control and care fund established under ). KRS

258.119

Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses:

Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).

3.

A person may receive a maximum of two (2) plates under this paragraph free of charge and may purchase additional plates for fees as established in subsection (2)(d) of this section.

I Support Veterans:

Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs). 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs).

Gold Star Siblings, Gold Star Sons, or Gold Star Daughters:

Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460 2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

POW/MIA Awareness:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460 2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans’ program trust fund established under ). KRS 40.460

Special license plates established under KRS

186.164

:

Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF). 2. Renewal Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).

Any special license plate may be combined with a personalized license plate for a twenty-five dollar ($25) state fee in addition to all other fees for the particular special license plate established in this section and in KRS 186.164(3). The twenty-five dollar ($25) fee required under this subsection shall be divided between the cabinet and the county clerk of the county where the applicant is applying for the license plate with the cabinet receiving twenty dollars ($20) and the county clerk receiving five dollars ($5).

A sponsoring organization of any special license plate issued under this section or any special license plate established under the provisions of KRS

186.164

may petition the cabinet for the production of that special license plate for motorcycles.

Owners and lessees of motorcycles registered under KRS 186.050(2) may be eligible to receive special license plates approved by the cabinet under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Applicants for a special license plate for a motorcycle shall be required to pay the fee for a special plate as prescribed in this section or in KRS

186.164

. The fee paid for the special plate for a motorcycle shall be in lieu of the registration fee required under KRS 186.050(2).

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 133, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 190, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 23, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 30, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2008, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 113, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 10, § 2, effective July 12, 2012 (see note); 2014, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 32, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective January 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 107, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 92, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2015). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 56 and 91, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/12/2012). The amendment to this statute in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, sec. 2, takes effect on July 12, 2012. The effective date of that amendment was subject to a contingency, but the contingency was removed in 2012. Section 5 of 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 139, which is effective July 12, 2012, repeals 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, sec. 4, which established the contingency. Section 6 of 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 139 states, “ KRS

186.162

and

186.1722

, as created or amended by 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 10, relating to an I Support Veterans special license plate, shall be effective on the normal effective date for the legislation enacted at the 2012 Regular Session of the General Assembly.” The normal effective date for that 2012 legislation is July 12, 2012.

(6/20/2005). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

(1)(h), during codification a manifest clerical or typographical error occurring in 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 133, § 1 (2)(c)2., has been corrected by changing “OSF” to “SF” to conform with definitions for that section found in § 1(1)(c) of that Act.

186.163.
Special license plates for specified military units — Qualifications — Proof required.

The Transportation Cabinet shall produce special military unit license plates for owners and lessees of motor vehicles, motorcycles, and recreational vehicles who are associated with the following units of the United States military:

The V Corps;

The 101st Airborne Division (Air Assault);

The 5th Special Forces Group;

The 160th Special Operations Aviation Regiment;

The United States Army Human Resources Command;

The United States Army Recruiting Command; or

The United States Army Cadet Command.

Each initial and renewal application for a special military unit license plate by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection and each initial application by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be accompanied by proof as set out in subsection (3) of this section that the person is associated with one (1) of the military units identified in subsection (1) of this section in one (1) of the following ways:

A member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the member’s spouse, or the member’s dependent child;

A Department of Defense civilian employee assigned to support one (1) of the military units, the employee’s spouse, or the employee’s dependent child;

A retired member; or

A veteran who received a discharge under honorable conditions, or the veteran’s surviving spouse, and:

Performed one hundred eighty (180) days of active military service;

Received an early release due to injury or other medical condition, or at the convenience of the service;

Received a hardship discharge;

Was separated or retired due to a disability; or

Was determined to have a service-connected disability incurred during the enlistment.

Prior to receiving a special military unit license plate requested under this section, the member shall present the following as proof of eligibility an original or copy of his or her:

Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;

DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, or DD-257 form; or

Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Defense.

A civilian employee of the Department of Defense who meets the criteria for a special military unit license plate under this section shall be eligible for a special military unit license plate and shall present as proof of eligibility an original or copy of one (1) of the following:

His or her current SF 50 form; or

Other Department of Defense documentation showing current employment.

The legally married spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or of a Department of Defense employee who meets the criteria for a special military unit license plate under this section shall be eligible for a special military unit license plate and shall present as proof of eligibility an original or copy of his or her marriage certificate establishing marriage to the member of the Armed Forces of the United States or to the Department of Defense employee and an original or copy of one (1) of the following:

His or her unexpired DD-1173 form;

Any identification document outlined in paragraph (a) of this subsection issued to his or her spouse;

A current SF 50 form issued to his or her spouse; or

Other Department of Defense documentation showing current employment of his or her spouse.

The dependent child of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or of a Department of Defense civilian employee who meets the criteria for a special military unit license plate under this section shall be eligible for a special military unit license plate and shall present as proof of eligibility establishing that he or she is a dependent child an original or copy of his or her birth certificate or certificate of adoption, a valid operator’s license, and an original or copy of one (1) of the following:

Any identification document outlined in paragraph (a) of this subsection issued to his or her parent;

A current SF 50 form issued to his or her parent; or

Other Department of Defense documentation showing current employment of his or her parent.

The member, retired member, civilian employee, spouse, or dependent child may purchase an unlimited number of special military unit license plates described in subsection (1) of this section annually for vehicles they own or lease.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

186.164.
Collection and distribution of special license plate fees — Design, printing, and replacement — Application process — Voluntary contribution for designated group — Administrative regulations — Audit of special license plate funds.

The SF portion of the fee required under KRS

186.162

shall include the fee to reflectorize all license plates under KRS

186.240

. All EF fees required under KRS

186.162

shall be collected at the time of an initial or renewal application by the county clerk who shall forward the EF fee to the cabinet. The cabinet shall remit EF fees to the group or organization identified in KRS 186.162 on a quarterly basis. The cabinet may retain any investment income earned from holding EF fees designated to be remitted under this subsection to offset administrative costs incurred by the cabinet in the administration of EF fees.

A special license plate shall be the color and design selected by the group or organization identified in subsection (13) of this section, contingent upon the approval of the Transportation Cabinet. In addition to the design selected for a special license plate, the name “Kentucky,” an annual renewal decal, and any combination of letters or numerals required by the cabinet in the design shall also appear on the plate.

An actual metal special license plate shall be issued on the same schedule as regular license plates are issued under KRS

186.240

. The cabinet shall have the discretion to extend the time period that will exist between the date a metal special license plate is issued and the date that regular plates are issued under KRS

186.240

. A renewal registration decal shall be issued all other years during the owner’s or lessee’s birth month, except as provided in KRS 186.041(2) and 186.042(5). A person seeking a special license plate for a vehicle provided as part of the person’s occupation shall conform to the requirements of KRS 186.050(14).

If a special license plate issued under this chapter deteriorates to the point that the lettering, numbering, or images on the face of the plate are not legible, the plate shall be replaced free of charge, if the owner or lessee has not transferred the vehicle to which the plate was issued during the current licensing period.

If a special license plate issued under this chapter is lost, stolen, or damaged in an accident, the county clerk shall issue a new plate upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee, if the owner or lessee has not transferred the vehicle to which the plate was issued during the current licensing period.

Upon the sale, transfer, or termination of a lease of a vehicle with any special license plate issued under this chapter, the owner or lessee shall remove the special plate and return it and the certificate of registration to the county clerk. The county clerk shall reissue the owner or lessee a regular license plate and a certificate of registration upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee. If the owner or lessee requests, the county clerk shall reissue the special plate upon payment of a three dollar ($3) county clerk fee for use on any other vehicle of the same classification and category owned, leased, or acquired by the person during the current licensing period. If the owner or lessee has the special plate reissued to a vehicle which has been previously registered in this state, the regular license plate that is being replaced shall be returned to the county clerk who shall forward the plate to the Transportation Cabinet.

A special license plate may be issued to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under KRS 186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), except a special license plate shall not be issued to a taxicab, limousine, or U-Drive-It registered and licensed under this chapter or KRS Chapter 281. A person applying for a special license plate shall apply in the office of the county clerk in the county of the person’s residence, except as provided in KRS 186.168(3). All special license plates issued under this chapter may be combined with a personalized license plate under the provisions of KRS

186.174

. The fee to combine a special license plate with a personalized license plate shall be as established in KRS 186.162(3).

Within thirty (30) days of termination from election to, appointment to, or membership with any group or organization, an applicant to whom a special license plate was issued under this chapter shall return the special license plate to the county clerk of the county of his or her residence, unless the person is merely changing his or her status with the group or organization to retired.

A group wanting to create a special license plate that is not authorized under this chapter on June 27, 2019, shall comply with the following conditions before being eligible to apply for a special license plate:

The group shall be nonprofit and based, headquartered, or have a chapter in Kentucky;

The group may be organized for, but shall not be restricted to, social, civic, or entertainment purposes;

The message to be placed on the license plate, if created, shall not discriminate against any race, color, religion, sex, or national origin, and shall not be construed, as determined by the cabinet, as an attempt to victimize or intimidate any person due to the person’s race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;

The plate shall not represent a political party and shall not have been created primarily to promote a specific political belief;

The plate shall not have as its primary purpose the promotion of any specific faith, religion, or antireligion;

The plate shall not be the name of a special product or brand name, and shall not be construed, as determined by the cabinet, as promoting a product or brand name; and

The plate’s lettering, logo, image, or message to be placed on the license plate, if created, shall not be obscene, as determined by the cabinet.

If the cabinet denies to issue a group a special license plate based upon the conditions specified in subsection (8) of this section, the cabinet shall, immediately upon denying to issue a group a special license plate, notify in writing the chairperson of both the House and Senate standing committees on transportation of the denial and the reasons upon which the cabinet based the denial.

If the cabinet approves a request for a special license plate, the cabinet shall begin designing and printing the plate after:

The group collects a minimum of nine hundred (900) applications with each application being accompanied by a fee as set forth in KRS

186.162

. The applications and accompanying fee shall be submitted to the cabinet at one (1) time as a whole and shall not be submitted individually or intermittently; and

The group submits to the cabinet the programming and production costs for the plate.

A group that is approved for a special license plate shall maintain a minimum number of five hundred (500) registrations annually for the cabinet to continue production of the plate.

An initial applicant for, or an applicant renewing, his or her registration for a special license plate shall, at the time of application, make a contribution that the county clerk shall forward to the cabinet as set forth in KRS

186.162

. The cabinet shall, on an annual basis, remit the contributions to the appropriate group identified to be used for the declared purpose stated under subsection (13) of this section. The cabinet may retain any investment income earned from holding contributions designated to be remitted under this subsection to offset administrative costs incurred by the cabinet in the administration of the contributions. Any group or organization that receives a mandatory EF fee under KRS

186.162

shall maintain the information required under subsection (13)(a) and (c) of this section with the Transportation Cabinet.

The group shall, at the time the nine hundred (900) applications are submitted to the Transportation Cabinet, also submit a notarized affidavit to the cabinet attesting to:

The name, address, and telephone number for the group or organization. If the group or organization does not have its headquarters in the Commonwealth, then the name, address, and telephone number for the group or organization’s Kentucky state chapter shall be required. The names of the officers of the group or organization shall also be required. If the entity receiving funds under subsection (12) of this section is not a state governmental agency, a program unit within a state governmental agency, or is a group or organization that does not have a statewide chapter, then a donation for use by the group or organization shall be prohibited;

The amount of the monetary donation the group wants to receive when a person purchases the group or organization’s special license plate; and

The purpose for which the donated funds will be used by the group or organization. Donated funds shall not be limited for use by members of the group or organization, and shall not be used for administrative or personnel costs of the group or organization.

All funds received by a group or organization under subsection (12) of this section shall be deposited into an account separate from all other accounts the group or organization may have, and the account shall be audited yearly at the expense of the group or organization. The completed audit shall be forwarded to the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort. One hundred percent (100%) of the funds received by a group or organization under subsection (12) of this section shall be used for the express purpose identified by the group in subsection (13) of this section. Any group or organization that receives a mandatory EF fee under KRS

186.162

shall comply with the provisions of this subsection.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to establish additional rules to implement the issuance of special license plates issued under this chapter, including but not limited to:

Documentation that will be required to accompany an application for a special license plate to provide proof of:

Election to the United States Congress or the Kentucky GeneralAssembly;

Election or appointment to the Kentucky Court of Justice;

Membership in a Masonic Order, Fraternal Order of Police, or emergency management organization;

Eligibility for membership in the Gold Star Mothers of America;

Eligibility as a father for associate membership in the Gold Star Mothers of America;

Eligibility for membership in the Gold Star Wives of America;

Ownership of an amateur radio operator license;

Receipt of the Silver Star Medal;

Receipt of the Bronze Star Medal;

Receipt of the Air Medal;

Receipt of the Distinguished Flying Cross;

Receipt of the Combat Action Badge;

Receipt of the Combat Infantry Badge;

Eligibility for a Gold Star Siblings license plate for a person whose sibling died while serving the country in the United States Armed Forces. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “sibling” means a sibling by blood, a sibling by half-blood, a sibling by adoption, or a stepsibling; or

Eligibility for a Gold Star Sons or Gold Star Daughters license plate for a person whose parent or stepparent died while serving the country in the United States Armed Forces;

The time schedule permissible for a group or organization to request a design change for the special license plate; and

The procedures for review of proposed license plates and the standards by which proposed special license plates are approved or rejected in accordance with subsection (10) of this section.

Any individual, group, or organization that fails to audit any funds received under this chapter, or that intentionally uses any funds received in any way other than attwsted to under subsection (13) of this section or for administrative or personnel costs in violation of subsection (13) of this section, shall be guilty of a Class D felony and upon conviction shall, in addition to being subject to criminal penalties, be assessed a mandatory five thousand dollar ($5,000) fine.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 133, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 40, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 40, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 30, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 33, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 72, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 113, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 19, § 39, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 32, § 2, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, § 2, effective January 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 148, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 107, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 92, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

186.165.
Exchange of one special license plate for another — Transfer of special license plate to another vehicle.

As used in this section, “owner” means a person who has purchased or leased a motor vehicle that is registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(1) or (3)(a).

The provisions of this chapter relating to special license plates to the contrary notwithstanding, if a vehicle has been issued a special license plate and the owner of the vehicle wishes to surrender the plate and exchange it for a different special license plate, the owner may, at the time he or she renews the vehicle’s annual registration, exchange the special plate without being required to obtain a regular registration plate.

An owner requesting to exchange a special license plate shall be required to surrender the special license plate issued to the vehicle and the appropriate certificate of registration to the county clerk of the county where the person lives. Upon payment of the fee established in subsection (4) of this section, the county clerk shall immediately exchange the special license plate and issue a new special license plate and certificate of registration without placing further requirements upon the owner.

The fee to exchange a special license plate under this section shall be the fee charged under this chapter for the particular special license plate which is being requested.

If a motor vehicle that has been issued a special license plate is sold prior to the expiration of the registration, the owner may, pursuant to KRS

186.190

, transfer the plate to another vehicle the owner has obtained.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 5, § 5, effective January 1, 2013.